Utah statutes.
4-12-5.   Labeling requirements for commercial and customer-formula feed
specified.
(1)  Each container of commercial feed, except customer-formula feed,
distributed in this state shall bear a label setting forth:
(a)  the name and principal address of the registrant;
(b)  the product or brand name, if any, under which it is distributed;
(c)  the feed ingredients stated in the manner prescribed by rule of the
department;
(d)  the net cumulative weight of the container and contents;
(e)  the lot number or some other means of lot identification; and
(f)  any information prescribed by rule of the department considered necessary
for the safe and effective use of the feed.
(2) (a)  Each bulk shipment of commercial feed, except customer-formula feed,
distributed in this state shall be accompanied with a printed or written
statement specifying the information in Subsection (1)(a) through (f) of this
section.
(b)  The statement shall be delivered to the purchaser at the time the bulk
feed is delivered.
(3)  Each container or bulk shipment of customer-formula feed distributed in
this state shall bear a label or be accompanied with an invoice setting forth:
(a)  the name and principal address of the manufacturer;
(b)  the name and principal address of the purchaser;
(c)  the date of delivery;
(d)  the net weight of each registered commercial feed used in the mixture and
the net weight of each other ingredient used; and
(e)  any information prescribed by rule of the department considered necessary
for the safe and effective use of the customer-formula feed.
